Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.125

Locally regulated utilities—Attachments to poles.

(1) As used in this section:

(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire, cable or other physical material capable of carrying electronic impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for telecommunications or television, including, but not limited to cable, and any related device, apparatus, or auxiliary equipment upon any pole owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more locally regulated utilities where the installation has been made with the necessary consent.

(b) "Locally regulated utility" means a code city owning and operating an electric utility not subject to rate or service regulation by the utilities and transportation commission.

(c) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not arbitrarily differentiate among or between similar classes of persons approved for attachments.

(2) All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded or received by a locally regulated utility for attachments to its poles must be just, reasonable, nondiscriminatory and sufficient. A locally regulated utility shall levy attachment space rental rates that are uniform for the same class of service within the locally regulated utility service area.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed or is intended to confer upon the utilities and transportation commission any authority to exercise jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

[ 1996 c 32 s 4.]